zh-CN: 助听设备样式: 耳背式; 后挂式; 头盔佩戴式; 入耳式耳塞; 颈带式; 包耳式耳罩; 被动式耳塞; 其他
es: Estilo amplificador de audición: Detrás de la oreja; Banda detrás de la cabeza; Montado en casco; Auricular intraural; Banda para el cuello; Orejera circumaural; Tapón para los oídos pasivo; Otro
ro-RO: Stilul amplificatorului auditiv: În spatele urechii; Bandă în spatele capului; Montat pe cască; Căști in-ear; Bandă pentru gât; Căști over-ear; Dop de urechi pasiv; Altele
th: สไตล์เครื่องช่วยฟัง: หลังใบหู; สายรัดหลังศีรษะ; ติดหมวกกันน็อก; หูฟังแบบอินเอียร์; สายคล้องคอ; ที่ครอบหู; ที่อุดหูแบบพาสซีฟ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Stil pojačivača sluha: Iza uha; Traka iza glave; Montirano na kacigu; Slušalica u uhu; Okolo vrata; Slušalice preko uha; Pasivni čepić za uho; Ostalo
ru: Тип усилителя слуха: Заушный; С затылочной дужкой; С креплением на шлем; Внутриканальный; Шейный ободок; Полноразмерные наушники; Пассивные беруши; Другое
lt-LT: Klausos stiprintuvo stilius: Už ausies; Už galvos; Tvirtinamas prie šalmo; Įkišamas į ausį; Ant kaklo; Ant ausų; Pasyvūs ausų kamštukai; Kita
sv: Typ av hörselförstärkare: Bakom örat; Nackbygel; Hjälmmonterad; In-ear-hörlur; Nackband; Over-ear-kåpa; Passiv öronpropp; Övrigt
nl: Hoorversterker stijl: Achter het oor; Band achter het hoofd; Op helm gemonteerd; In-ear oordopje; Nekband; Over-ear oorkap; Passieve oordop; Overig
de: Stil des Hörverstärkers: Hinter-dem-Ohr; Hinter-dem-Kopf-Bügel; Helmmontage; In-Ear-Ohrhörer; Nackenbügel; Over-Ear-Kapselgehörschutz; Passiver Ohrstöpsel; Sonstige
vi: Kiểu dáng thiết bị trợ thính: Đeo sau tai; Vòng ra sau đầu; Gắn vào mũ bảo hiểm; Nhét tai; Đeo quanh cổ; Chụp tai chống ồn; Nút bịt tai thụ động; Khác
pt-PT: estilo amplificador de audição: Atrás da orelha; Aro de nuca; De fixar ao capacete; Auscultador intra-auricular; De pescoço; Auscultador tipo concha; Tampão passivo; Outro
tr: İşitme güçlendirici tipi: Kulak arkası; Baş arkası bant; Kaska monteli; Kulak içi kulaklık; Boyun bandı; Kulak üstü koruyucu; Pasif kulak tıkacı; Diğer
pt-BR: Estilo do amplificador de audição: Atrás da orelha; Faixa atrás da cabeça; Montado no capacete; Fone intra-auricular; Alça de pescoço; Protetor auditivo circum-aural; Tampão de ouvido passivo; Outro
pl: Styl wzmacniacza słuchu: Za uchem; Pałąk z tyłu głowy; Montowany na kasku; Douszne; Pałąk na szyję; Nauszniki; Pasywne zatyczki do uszu; Inne
nb: Hørselsforsterkerstil: Bak øret; Bånd bak hodet; Hjelmmontert; I øret-ørepropp; Nakkebånd; Over øret-øreklokke; Passiv ørepropp; Annet
sk-SK: Typ pomôcky na zlepšenie sluchu: Za ucho; Pás cez zátylok; Montáž na prilbu; Do ucha; Pás na krk; Cez ucho; Pasívne štuple; Iné
sl-SI: Slog ojačevalca sluha: Za uho; Trak za glavo (zadaj); Nameščeno na čeladi; V ušesu (čepki); Ovratni trak; Čez uho (glušniki); Pasivni čepki za ušesa; Drugo
ko: 보청기 스타일: 귀걸이형; 후두부 밴드형; 헬멧 장착형; 인이어 이어버드; 넥밴드형; 오버이어 귀마개형; 패시브 귀마개; 기타
el: Στυλ ενισχυτή ακοής: Πίσω από το αυτί; Στέκα πίσω από το κεφάλι; Τοποθέτηση σε κράνος; Εντός του αυτιού; Στήριγμα λαιμού; Κλειστού τύπου; Παθητική ωτοασπίδα; Άλλο
cs: Styl zesilovače sluchu: Závěsné; Páska za hlavou; Připojeno na helmu; Špuntové do uší; Nákrčník; Mušlové přes uši; Pasivní ucpávka do uší; Jiné
ja: 聴覚増強器スタイル: 耳かけ型; 後頭部バンド型; ヘルメットマウント型; インイヤーイヤホン型; ネックバンド型; オーバーイヤーイヤーマフ型; パッシブ耳栓; その他
it: Stile di potenziatore acustico: Retroauricolare; Fascia nucale; Montato sul casco; Auricolare in-ear; Fascia da collo; Cuffia over-ear; Tappo passivo; Altro
fi: Kuulonvahvistimen tyyli: Korvan taakse asetettava; Pään takaa kulkeva panta; Kypäräkiinnitteinen; Nappikuuloke; Niskasanka; Korvan yli asetettava kuulonsuojain; Passiivinen korvatulppa; Muu
da: Type af høreforstærker: Bag øret; Bånd bag hovedet; Hjelmmonteret; In-ear-øretelefon; Nakkebøjle; Over-ear-høreværn; Passiv øreprop; Andet
bg-BG: Стил на слуховия усилвател: Зад ухото; Лента зад главата; За монтиране на каска; В ухото (тип тапа); Лента за врата; Над ухото (тип антифон); Пасивна тапа за уши; Други
zh-TW: 助聽增強器款式: 耳背式; 後掛式; 安全帽安裝式; 入耳式; 頸掛式; 耳罩式; 被動式耳塞; 其他
fr: Style d’amplificateur auditif: Contour d’oreille; Tour de nuque; Fixation sur casque; Écouteurs intra-auriculaires; Tour de cou; Casque circum-auriculaire; Bouchons d’oreilles passifs; Autre
hu: Hallásjavító stílus: Fül mögötti; Tarkópántos; Sisakhoz rögzíthető; Hallójárati (agybadugós); Nyakpántos; Fület befedő fülvédő; Passzív füldugó; Egyéb
en: Hearing enhancer style: Behind-the-ear; Behind-the-head band; Helmet-mounted; In-ear earbud; Neckband; Over-ear earmuff; Passive earplug; Other